Utah statutes.
58-37d-3.   Definitions.
(1)  As used in this chapter:
(a)  "Booby trap" means any concealed or camouflaged device designed to cause
bodily injury when triggered by any action of a person making contact with the
device.  This term includes guns, ammunition, or explosive devices attached to
trip wires or other triggering mechanisms, sharpened stakes, nails, spikes,
electrical devices, lines or wires with hooks attached, and devices for the
production of toxic fumes or gases.
(b)  "Clandestine laboratory operation" means the:
(i)  purchase or procurement of chemicals, supplies, equipment, or laboratory
location for the illegal manufacture of specified controlled substances;
(ii)  transportation or arranging for the transportation of chemicals,
supplies, or equipment for the illegal manufacture of specified controlled
substances;
(iii)  setting up of equipment or supplies in preparation for the illegal
manufacture of specified controlled substances;
(iv)  activity of compounding, synthesis, concentration, purification,
separation, extraction, or other physical or chemical processing of any
substance, including a controlled substance precursor, or the packaging,
repackaging, labeling, or relabeling of a container holding a substance that
is a product of any of these activities, when the substance is to be used for
the illegal manufacture of specified controlled substances;
(v)  illegal manufacture of specified controlled substances; or
(vi)  distribution or disposal of chemicals, equipment, supplies, or products
used in or produced by the illegal manufacture of specified controlled
substances.
(c)  "Controlled substance precursor" means those chemicals designated in
Title 58, Chapter 37c, Controlled Substance Precursor Act, except those
substances designated in Subsections 58-37c-3(2)(kk) and (ll).
(d)  "Disposal" means the abandonment, discharge, deposit, injection, dumping,
spilling, leaking, or placing of any hazardous or dangerous material into or
on any property, land or water so that the material may enter the environment,
be emitted into the air, or discharged into any waters, including groundwater.
(e)  "Hazardous or dangerous material" means any substance which because of
its quantity, concentration, physical characteristics, or chemical
characteristics may cause or significantly contribute to an increase in
mortality, an increase in serious illness, or may pose a substantial present
or potential future hazard to human health or the environment when improperly
treated, stored, transported, disposed of, or otherwise improperly managed.
(f)  "Illegal manufacture of specified controlled substances" means in
violation of Title 58, Chapter 37, Utah Controlled Substances Act, the:
(i)  compounding, synthesis, concentration, purification, separation,
extraction, or other physical or chemical processing for the purpose of
producing methamphetamine, other amphetamine compounds as listed in Schedule I
of the Utah Controlled Substances Act, phencyclidine, narcotic analgesic
analogs as listed in Schedule I of the Utah Controlled Substances Act,
lysergic acid diethylamide, or mescaline;
(ii)  conversion of cocaine or methamphetamine to their base forms; or
(iii)  extraction, concentration, or synthesis of marijuana as that drug is
defined in Section 58-37-2.
(2)  Unless otherwise specified, the definitions in Section 58-37-2 also apply
to this chapter.
